Maryland, session 2025, SB0048.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
4–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Department” means the Department of General Services.
(c) “Secretary” means the Secretary of General Services.
4–211.
– 1 –

Ch. 247 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “EXECUTIVE AGENCY” MEANS A UNIT OF THE EXECUTIVE
BRANCH OF STATE GOVERNMENT.
(3) “IDENTIFICATION CARD” MEANS A SECURITY CARD ISSUED BY
THE DEPARTMENT TO A STATE EMPLOYEE OR OTHER INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED BY
THE SECRETARY, INCLUDING A CONTRACTOR, REGULATED LOBBYIST, MEDIA
PERSONNEL, LOCAL GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL, OR VOLUNTEER.
(B) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY INCLUDE A NOTATION ON AN
IDENTIFICATION CARD INDICATING THAT THE HOLDER IS A VETERAN IF THE
INDIVIDUAL ISSUED THE IDENTIFICATION CARD PRESENTS A CERTIFICATION OF
VETERAN STATUS OBTAINED FROM THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AND MILITARY
FAMILIES IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–905 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, A
DD FORM 214, OR OTHER DOCUMENTATION ACCEPTABLE TO THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY LIMIT THE NOTATION AUTHORIZED BY
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO A CERTAIN CATEGORY OR CATEGORIES OF
IDENTIFICATION CARD HOLDERS.
(C) (1) IF THE DEPARTMENT PROVIDES AN OPTION FOR A NOTATION ON
AN IDENTIFICATION CARD THAT INDICATES THAT THE HOLDER IS A VETERAN, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL INCLUDE ON THE APPLICATION FOR THE IDENTIFICATION
CARD THE OPTION FOR THE APPLICANT TO:
(I) INDICATE THAT THE APPLICANT IS A VETERAN; AND
(II) CONSENT TO BEING CONTACTED BY APPROPRIATE
EXECUTIVE AGENCIES REGARDING THE INDIVIDUAL’S ELIGIBILITY FOR STATE OR
FEDERAL VETERANS’ BENEFITS.
(2) (I) IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 4, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE
GENERAL PROVISIONS ARTICLE AND ANY OTHER APPLICABLE LAW, AND ON
REQUEST BY AN EXECUTIVE AGENCY, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL TRANSMIT TO THE
EXECUTIVE AGENCY APPROPRIATE INFORMATION ABOUT EACH IDENTIFICATION
CARD HOLDER WHO HAS GIVEN CONSENT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(II) UNLESS OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED OR REQUIRED BY LAW,
THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT TRANSMIT INFORMATION OBTAINED ON AN
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 247
APPLICATION FOR AN IDENTIFICATION CARD THAT RELATES TO THE APPLICANT’S
STATUS AS A VETERAN UNLESS THE APPLICANT HAS GIVEN CONSENT UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 3 –